Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-106
Relinquishments and consents; signature; witnesses; acknowledgment.

Relinquishments and consents required to be given under sections 43-104 and 43-105 must be acknowledged before an officer authorized to acknowledge deeds in this state and signed in the presence of at least one witness, in addition to the officer.

Laws 1943, c. 104, § 4(3), p. 351;

R.S.1943, § 43-106;

Laws 1951, c. 128, § 1, p. 547;

Laws 1965, c. 233, § 1, p. 678;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 20;

Laws 2022, LB741, § 23.

Acknowledgment held valid, no particular form of acknowledgment being specified. Batt v. Nebraska Children's Home Society, 185 Neb. 124, 174 N.W.2d 88 (1970).

Consent to adoption must be witnessed and acknowledged. McCauley v. Stewart, 177 Neb. 759, 131 N.W.2d 174 (1964).